Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2429
Sections; supersede common law; extent;
construction.

Sections 76-2401 to 76-2430 shall supersede
the duties and responsibilities of the parties under the common law, including
fiduciary responsibilities of an agent to a principal, except as provided
in subsection (6) of section 76-2422. Sections 76-2401 to 76-2430 shall be
construed broadly to accomplish their purposes.

Laws 1994, LB 883, § 29;

Laws 2011, LB25, § 14.

Case law defining common-law fiduciary duties is irrelevant to the determination whether a real estate broker breached the duties owed by statute, unless otherwise specified in a written agency agreement pursuant to section 76-2422(6). Professional Mgmt. Midwest v. Lund Co., 284 Neb. 777, 826 N.W.2d 225 (2012).

Unless otherwise specified in a written agency agreement pursuant to section 76-2422(6), the fiduciary duties owed by a real estate broker derive only from the performance of limited activities defined in section 81-885.01(2). Professional Mgmt. Midwest v. Lund Co., 284 Neb. 777, 826 N.W.2d 225 (2012).